Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1118
Recapture of tax credit; notice of
noncompliance; cure period.

The
enforcement of section 77-1117 shall be subject to a six-month cure period.
No recapture under section 77-1117 shall occur until the qualified community
development entity has been given notice of noncompliance and afforded six
months from the date of such notice to cure the noncompliance.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 18.